Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4523.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7105. (1) Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, subsection (2), this article governs the duties and powers of a trustee, relations among trustees, and the rights and interests of a trust beneficiary. (2) The terms of a trust prevail over any provision of parts 2 to 9 of this article except the following: (a) The requirements under sections 7401 and 7402(1)(e) for creating a trust. (b) Except as otherwise provided in sections 7703a and 7703b, the duty of a trustee to administer a trust in accordance with section 7801. (c) The requirement under section 7404 that the trust have a purpose that is lawful, not contrary to public policy, and possible to achieve. (d) The duration limits specified in all of the following: (i) Section 7408 for the care of animals. (ii) Section 7409 for other noncharitable purpose trusts. (iii) Section 7409a for nondisclosure periods. (e) The power of the court to modify or terminate a trust under sections 7410, 7412(1) to (3), 7414(2), 7415, and 7416. (f) The effect of a spendthrift provision, a support provision, and a discretionary trust provision on the rights of certain creditors and assignees to reach a trust as provided in part 5. (g) The power of the court under section 7702 to require, dispense with, or modify or terminate a bond. (h) The power of the court under section 7708(2) to adjust a trustee's compensation specified in the terms of the trust that is unreasonably low or high. (i) The obligations imposed on a trust director in section 7703a(4) and (5). (j) The power of the court to appoint a person to enforce a trust described in section 7408 or 7409. (k) (j) Except as provided in section 7409a, the duty under section 7814(2)(a) to (c) to provide beneficiaries with the terms of the trust and information about the trust's property, and to notify qualified trust beneficiaries of an irrevocable trust of the existence of the trust and the identity of the trustee. (l) (k) The power of the court to order the trustee to provide statements of account and other information under section 7814(4). (m) (l) The effect of an exculpatory term under section 7703a(5)(b) or 7908. (n) (m) The effect of a release of a trustee or trust director from liability for breach of trust under section 7703a(8). (o) (n) The rights under sections 7910 to 7913 of a person other than a trustee or beneficiary. (p) (o) Periods of limitation under this article for commencing a judicial proceeding. (q) (p) The power of the court to take action and exercise jurisdiction. (r) (q) The subject-matter jurisdiction of the court and venue for commencing a proceeding as provided in sections 7203 and 7204. (r) The requirement under section 7113 that a provision in a trust that purports to penalize an interested person for contesting the trust or instituting another proceeding relating to the trust must not be given effect if probable cause exists for instituting a proceeding contesting the trust or another proceeding relating to the trust. (s) The requirement under section 7703b(2)(d) regarding the eligibility of a trust's sole beneficiary to be a separate trustee as that term is defined in section 7703b. Sec. 7110. (1) A charitable organization expressly named in the terms of a trust to receive distributions under the terms of a charitable trust has the rights of a qualified trust beneficiary under this article if 1 or more of the following are applicable to the charitable organization on the date the charitable organization's qualification is being determined: (a) The charitable organization is a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal. (b) The charitable organization would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal on the termination of the interests of other distributees or permissible distributees then receiving or eligible to receive distributions. (c) The charitable organization would be a distributee or permissible distributee of trust income or principal if the trust terminated on that date. (2) A person appointed to enforce a trust created for the care of an animal under section 7408 or another noncharitable trust under section 7409 has the rights of a qualified trust beneficiary under this article. (3) During Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, during the nondisclosure period of a trust described in section 7409a, a person granted a nondisclosure correlative right or protection power over the trust has the rights of a qualified trust beneficiary under this article. (4) The attorney general of this state has the following rights with respect to a charitable trust having its principal place of administration in this state: (a) The rights provided in the supervision of trustees for charitable purposes act, 1961 PA 101, MCL 14.251 to 14.266. (b) The right to notice of any judicial proceeding and any nonjudicial settlement agreement under section 7111.